Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.070

Deputies and employees.

In all cases where the duties of any county office are greater than can be performed by the person elected to fill it, the officer may employ deputies and other necessary employees with the consent of the board of county commissioners. The board shall fix their compensation and shall require what deputies shall give bond and the amount of bond required from each. The sureties on deputies' bonds must be approved by the board and the premium therefor is a county expense.

A deputy may perform any act which his or her principal is authorized to perform. The officer appointing a deputy or other employee shall be responsible for the acts of his or her appointees upon his or her official bond and may revoke each appointment at pleasure.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4009; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 92; 1963 c 4 s 36.16.070. Prior: 1959 c 216 s 3; 1957 c 219 s 2; prior: (i) Code 1881 s 2716; 1869 p 312 s 10; 1863 p 550 s 7; 1854 p 425 s 7; RRS s 4093. (ii) Code 1881 s 2741; 1863 p 553 s 4; 1854 p 427 s 4; RRS s 4108. (iii) Code 1881 s 2767, part; 1871 p 110 s 1, part; 1863 p 557 s 2, part; 1854 p 434 s 2, part; RRS s 4160, part. (iv) 1905 c 60 s 1; RRS s 4177. (v) 1905 c 60 s 2; RRS s 4178. (vi) 1905 c 60 s 3; RRS s 4179. (vii) 1949 c 200 s 1, part; 1945 c 87 s 1, part; 1937 c 197 s 3, part; 1925 ex.s. c 148 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4200-5a, part. (viii) 1943 c 260 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4200-5b.]

NOTES:

County clerk, deputies of: Chapter 2.32 RCW.